Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.060

Licensure by endorsement.

Upon the recommendation of the board, the secretary shall license as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant and shall furnish a license to any person who is a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant registered, certified, or licensed under the laws of another state or territory, or the District of Columbia, if the qualifications for such registration, certification, or license required of the applicant were substantially equal to the requirements under this chapter. At the time of making application, the applicant shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees established pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2007 c 98 s 6; 1996 c 191 s 60; 1991 c 3 s 179; 1985 c 7 s 64; 1983 c 116 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 66; 1961 c 64 s 5; 1949 c 239 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-6.]